Tennessee, session 114, HB0117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-410(a)(3)(C), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-410(h)(5), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0117
000184
- 1 -